District of Columbia statutes.
19-1310.07

Event affecting administration or distribution.

If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, the attainment of a specified age, or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a trustee who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for a loss resulting from the trustee’s lack of knowledge.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1007 of the Uniform Trust Code.